incubator/apertium-wal/tests/verbs-ivtv.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../wal.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../wal.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[lexc] kk becomes ss when verb becomes transitive":
    aakk<v><iv><p3><sing><masc><prf> : aakkiis
    aakk<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><prf> : aassiis

 "[lexc] qq becomes ss when verb becomes transitive":
    aduqq<v><iv><p3><sing><masc><prf> : aduqqiis
    aduqq<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><prf> : adussiis

 "[lexc] a few passive forms":
    imm<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><prf> : immiis
    imm<v><tv><pass><p3><sing><masc><prf> : imettiis
    qachch<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><prf> : qachchiis
    qachch<v><tv><pass><p3><sing><masc><prf> : qashettiis
    m<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><prf> : miis
    m<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><prf> : miissiis
    m<v><tv><pass><p3><sing><masc><prf> : meetettiis
